test/src/morphology/V-kaeaeqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kǟ’dõ: # Verb 5 'eng /est käia/fin' - full paradigm
     kǟ’dõ+V+Inf: kǟ’dõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ger: kǟ’dsõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ger: kǟ’dsõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+Sup: kǟ’mõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Ine: kǟ’mõõs
     kǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Ela: kǟ’mõõst
     kǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Tra: kǟ’mõõks
     kǟ’dõ+V+Sup+Abe: kǟ’mõõt
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kǟ’b
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kǟ’tõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kǟ’bõd
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ke’i
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ke’itõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ke’itõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kǟ’
     kǟ’dõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kǟ’ks
     kǟ’dõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kǟ’
     kǟ’dõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kǟ’
     kǟ’dõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kǟ’gid
     kǟ’dõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kǟ’gõ
     kǟ’dõ+V+QuoSg3: kē’ji
     kǟ’dõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kǟ’nd
     kǟ’dõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kǟ’dõd
